pt-BR: Flauta doce afinação padrão (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Outro
lt-LT: Blokflauto derinimo standartas (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Kita
ja: リコーダーのピッチ基準 (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; その他
it: Tonalità standard del flauto dolce (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Altro
es: Estándar de afinación La4 de la flauta dulce: A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Otro
da: Standard for blokfløjtes tonehøjde (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Andet
zh-TW: 直笛音高標準 (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; 其他
pl: Standard stroju fletu prostego (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Inne
sk-SK: Norma výšky tónu zobcovej flauty (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Iné
zh-CN: 竖笛音高标准 (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; 其他
cs: Standard rozteče zobcové flétny (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Ostatní
th: มาตรฐานระดับเสียงของเครื่องบันทึกเสียง (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Standardna visina tona flaute (A4): A = 392 Hz; A = 415 Hz; A = 430 Hz; A = 440 Hz; A = 442 Hz; A = 443 Hz; A = 444 Hz; A = 466 Hz; Ostalo
el: Πρότυπο τονικότητας φλογέρας (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Άλλο
nl: Blokfluit toonhoogtestandaard (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Overig
tr: Blokflüt perde standardı (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Diğer
en: Recorder pitch standard (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Other
pt-PT: Norma de afinação da flauta (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Outro
nb: Standard blokkfløytetone (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Annet
sv: Blockflöjtens tonhöjdsstandard (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Övrigt
bg-BG: Стандарт на настройка на блокфлейтата (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Други
ko: 리코더 표준 음정(A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; 기타
fr: Diapason de la flûte à bec (la4): La = 392 Hz; La = 415 Hz; La = 430 Hz; La = 440 Hz; La = 442 Hz; La = 443 Hz; La = 444 Hz; La = 466 Hz; Autre
de: Stimmung der Blockflöte (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Sonstige
hu: Furulya hangolási szabványa (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Egyéb
ro-RO: Standardul de înălțime al flautului drept (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Altele
ru: Стандарт строя блокфлейты (A4): A=392 Гц; A=415 Гц; A=430 Гц; A=440 Гц; A=442 Гц; A=443 Гц; A=444 Гц; A=466 Гц; Другое
vi: Cao độ chuẩn của sáo recorder (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Khác
fi: Nokkahuilun sävelkorkeuden standardi (A4): A=392 Hz; A=415 Hz; A=430 Hz; A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; A=444 Hz; A=466 Hz; Muu
sl-SI: Standard uglasitve kljunaste flavte (A4): A = 392 Hz; A = 415 Hz; A = 430 Hz; A = 440 Hz; A = 442 Hz; A = 443 Hz; A = 444 Hz; A = 466 Hz; Drugo